Rhode Island statutes. Title 35 Public Finance
Chapter 15 Savings Bond Program

35-15-1.
Legislative findings.

It is declared that, for the benefit of the people of the state, the conduct and increase of their commerce, the protection and enhancement of their welfare, the development of continued prosperity, and the improvement of their health and living conditions, it is essential that this and future generations be given the fullest opportunity to learn and to develop their intellectual skills and be given the fullest access to affordable housing. In order to achieve these ends it is important that Rhode Island citizens be provided with an investment opportunity to enhance their financial access to institutions of higher education and access to housing within this state. It is the intent of the general assembly to provide the people of the state with an alternative method of saving for the purpose of encouraging enrollment in institutions of higher education and for the purpose of encouraging the purchase of residential dwellings within the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 426, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 54, § 1.

35-15-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“College and university savings bond program” shall mean the program of encouraging enrollment in institutions of higher education by providing for a method of investment.

“General obligation bond acts” shall mean:

Any future public law which authorizes the state to issue its general obligation bonds, except those acts that expressly provide that this chapter shall not apply thereto; and

The following authorized but unissued bond authorizations of the state:

Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) for land acquisition-industrial development under P.L. 1979, ch. 157;

Sixty-four million, seven hundred thousand, dollars ($64,700,000) for the Narragansett Bay water quality management district commission under P.L. 1980, ch. 342;

One million dollars ($1,000,000) for the purpose of state water supplies under P.L. 1980, ch. 163;

Four thousand, six hundred, dollars ($4,600) for behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals under P.L. 1980, ch. 163;

One million, three hundred ninety thousand, dollars ($1,390,000) for transportation under P.L. 1982, ch. 344, as amended by P.L. 1982, ch. 455;

Two million, one hundred ten thousand, dollars ($2,110,000) for children, youth and families under P.L. 1982, ch. 344;

Seven million dollars ($7,000,000) for transportation under P.L. 1983, ch. 332;

Seven million, four hundred thousand, dollars ($7,400,000) for a water facilities assistance program under P.L. 1983, ch. 332;

Three million, four hundred forty thousand, dollars ($3,440,000) for behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals under P.L. 1984, ch. 156;

Five million dollars ($5,000,000) for environmental response fund-hazardous waste under P.L. 1984, ch. 403;

Two million, two hundred thousand, dollars ($2,200,000) for higher education under P.L. 1984, ch. 156;

Two million, twenty thousand, dollars ($2,020,000) for elementary and secondary education under P.L. 1984, ch. 156;

Four million, five hundred fifty-five thousand, dollars ($4,555,000) for sewerage and water supply failure fund under P.L. 1984, ch. 420;

Five million dollars ($5,000,000) for the emergency telephone system under P.L. 1984, ch. 144;

Five million, five hundred thousand, dollars ($5,500,000) for state house renovations under P.L. 1985, ch. 367;

Five million dollars ($5,000,000) for handicapped accessibility improvements under P.L. 1985, ch. 367;

Sixteen million dollars ($16,000,000) for transportation under P.L. 1985, ch. 367;

One million, eight hundred fifteen thousand, dollars ($1,815,000) for agricultural land preservation under P.L. 1985, ch. 367;

Nine million, six hundred eighty thousand, dollars ($9,680,000) for behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals under P.L. 1985, ch. 367;

Sixteen million dollars ($16,000,000) for asbestos abatement under P.L. 1985, ch. 366;

Seven million, eight hundred twenty thousand, dollars ($7,820,000) for heritage preservation under P.L. 1985, ch. 369;

One million, five hundred thousand, dollars ($1,500,000) for underground storage tank replacement under P.L. 1985, ch. 486;

Thirty-five million dollars ($35,000,000) for the Clean Water Act environmental trust fund under P.L. 1986, ch. 289;

Eleven million, six hundred ninety thousand, dollars ($11,690,000) for behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals under P.L. 1986, ch. 419;

Fifty-five million, four hundred ninety thousand, dollars ($55,490,000) for transportation under P.L. 1986, ch. 419;

Thirteen million, six hundred thousand, dollars ($13,600,000) for water resources under P.L. 1986, ch. 419;

Fifteen million, twenty-five thousand, dollars ($15,025,000) for environmental management under P.L. 1986, ch. 419;

One million, five hundred eighty thousand, dollars ($1,580,000) for human services under P.L. 1986, ch. 419;

Six million, five hundred thousand, dollars ($6,500,000) for children, youth and families under P.L. 1986, ch. 419;

Two million dollars ($2,000,000) for hazardous waste under P.L. 1986, ch. 419;

Eight million, seven hundred thousand, dollars ($8,700,000) for higher education facilities under P.L. 1986, ch. 419;

Sixty-five million, two hundred thousand, dollars ($65,200,000) for open space and recreational areas under P.L. 1987, ch. 425; and

Twelve million, twenty-five thousand, dollars ($12,025,000) for Blackstone Valley district commission P.L. 1986, ch. 289;

“Housing assistance downpayment savings bond program” shall mean the program of enhancing the ability of residents of the state to purchase residential dwellings within the state by providing for a method of savings and investment.

“Institution of higher education” shall mean an educational institution situated within or without this state which by virtue of law or charter is a public or other nonprofit educational institution empowered to provide a program of education beyond the high school level and which is accredited by a nationally recognized educational accrediting agency or association and awards an associate’s, bachelor’s, or advance degree or provides a program of not less than two (2) years’ duration which is acceptable for full credit toward a bachelor’s degree.

“Rhode Island savings bonds” shall mean general obligation bonds of the state which are:

Designated as general obligation savings bonds by the governor and the general treasurer; and

Are issued under the provisions of the “general obligation and bonds acts”, as that term is defined in paragraph (2).

“State” shall mean the state of Rhode Island.

“State of Rhode Island savings plan advisory board” or “advisory board” shall mean the board created and established in §

35-15-3

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 426, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 54, § 1.

35-15-3.
Creation and duties of advisory board.

The state of Rhode Island savings bond advisory board is hereby created and established to perform the duties and exercise the powers listed in this section. Pursuant to the powers delegated to the department of the treasury, the department shall have the responsibility for supervising, organizing, and evaluating the advisory board and the savings bond program. The advisory board shall consist of the general treasurer, the commissioner of higher education, the director of administration, and the executive director of the Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation or their respective designees, and four (4) additional members to be appointed as follows: the governor, the lieutenant governor, the president of the senate, and the speaker of the house of representatives shall each appoint one member. The governor, the lieutenant governor, president of the senate, and the speaker of the house of representatives shall select members on the basis of their knowledge, skill, and experience in the fields of business, education, housing, or finance. The general treasurer shall serve as chairperson of the advisory board, and the advisory board shall elect one of its members as vice-chairperson and another as secretary-treasurer. The appointed members of the advisory board first appointed shall serve for terms expiring on June 30, 1991, or until their successors have been appointed and have qualified. Following this determination, each member shall swear or solemnly affirm to administer the duties of office faithfully and impartially, indicating by date when the term of the member shall expire. Upon the expiration of the term of any appointed member, the successor member shall be appointed for a term of three (3) years or until a successor has been appointed and has qualified. Any vacancy shall be filled in the manner of the original appointment for the remainder of the unexpired term. The members shall receive no compensation for the performance of their duties, but each member shall be reimbursed for reasonable expenses incurred in carrying out and performing their duties under this chapter.

The advisory board shall have the following responsibilities and duties:

To implement the Rhode Island savings bond program;

To the extent permitted by federal and state laws, to develop and conduct marketing and advertising campaigns for the savings bonds and other instruments;

To make recommendations to the governor, the general treasurer, and the budget office regarding the terms and conditions of the offering of savings bonds, including methods by which the offering may be conducted;

To advise the governor, the general treasurer, and the department of administration regarding minimum denominations, maturity dates, and increments of the savings bonds; and

To make reports to the general assembly annually.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 426, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 54, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 73.

35-15-4.
Issuance and sales of savings bonds.

In order to provide the people of the state: (1) with access to institutions of higher education; and (2) the financial means to purchase residential housing; there shall be issued with all bonds of the state, authorized by the provisions of the general obligation bond acts, savings bonds in such amounts as determined by the general treasurer with the approval of the governor. Bonds to be issued and sold as savings bonds shall be designated by the governor and the general treasurer as “general obligation savings bonds” in the proceedings authorizing the issuance of the bonds, and shall be subject to all of the terms and provisions of the general obligation bond acts, except as provided in §§

35-15-5

and

35-15-6

and except that savings bonds may bear interest payable at such time or times, and may be sold in such a manner, and as may be determined by the governor and the general treasurer. Savings bonds may be sold at a negotiated sale if the governor and general treasurer determine that a negotiated sale will result in either a more efficient and economic sale of the savings bonds or greater access to the savings bonds by residents in the state. If any savings bonds are sold at a negotiated sale, the underwriter or underwriters to which the bonds are sold shall, in the judgment of the general treasurer, have sufficient capability to make a broad distribution of the bonds to investors resident in the state. The aggregate original principal amount of the bonds will be the sole and exclusive test for determining whether general obligation bonds have been issued in the amounts approved by the vote of the people in the general obligation bond acts. In making these determinations, the interest component of the savings bonds shall be disregarded.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 426, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 54, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 209, § 1.

35-15-5.
Security for savings bonds.

Any savings bonds issued pursuant to this chapter shall be direct, general obligations of the state and subject to repayment as provided in the general obligation bond acts; provided, that in the proceedings of the governor and the general treasurer authorizing the issuance of the bonds, those officials may covenant on behalf of the state with or for the benefit of the holders of the bonds as to all matters deemed advisable by those officials, including the terms and conditions for creating and maintaining sinking funds, reserve funds, and such other special funds as may be created in those proceedings, separate and apart from all other funds and accounts of the state, and those officials may make such other covenants as may be deemed necessary or desirable to assure the prompt payment of the principal of and interest on those bonds when due.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 426, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 54, § 1.

35-15-6.
Authorization of additional terms.

Notwithstanding any contrary provision of any general obligation bond act, the general treasurer, with the approval of the governor, is authorized and empowered to issue bonds in serial or term form in the name of and on behalf of the state, in amounts that will raise usable bond proceeds in an amount equal to the total amount for the projects authorized by the general obligation bond acts as has been approved by vote of the people.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 426, § 1.